Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.221

Licenses—Names—Restrictions as to use.

No license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall authorize any person other than the person named on the license to do any act by virtue thereof nor to operate in any other manner than under the name appearing on the license. A real estate firm has the option to utilize one or more assumed names in the conduct and operation of the firm's real estate business. However, before using a name other than that appearing on the license, the firm must obtain a separate license for each and every additional assumed name. All real estate brokerage services shall be conducted in the name of the real estate firm or its licensed assumed name or names.

[ 2008 c 23 s 23; 1997 c 322 s 14; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 16; 1951 c 222 s 14; 1945 c 111 s 2; 1941 c 252 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8340-33. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 9. Formerly RCW 18.85.170.]